Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 7. INTERGOVERNMENTAL RELATIONS

CHAPTER 752. IMMIGRATION

SUBCHAPTER A. OFFICE OF IMMIGRATION AND REFUGEE AFFAIRS

Sec. 752.001. OFFICE OF IMMIGRATION AND REFUGEE AFFAIRS. The Office of Immigration and Refugee Affairs is created within the Texas Department of Human Services.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 627, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 526, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 752.003. REFUGEE COORDINATOR. The governor shall appoint a refugee coordinator for the office to serve at the pleasure of the governor. The refugee coordinator shall serve as chief administrative officer of the office and shall ensure coordination of public and private resources in refugee resettlement.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 627, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 526, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 752.004. APPLICATION FOR AND DISTRIBUTION OF FEDERAL FUNDS. The office shall apply for the maximum amount of federal funds available through the Immigration Reform and Control Act of 1986 (8 U.S.C. Section 1101 et seq.) and the Refugee Act of 1980 (8 U.S.C. Section 1521 et seq.). The office shall apply for those funds and shall distribute the funds to agencies responsible for providing services to newly legalized aliens and refugees in accordance with federal law. The office may retain a portion of the federal funds to cover reasonable costs incurred in securing and administering the funds. The office may delegate to an appropriate state agency the administration of funds under this section.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 627, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 752.007. OTHER FUNCTIONS OF OFFICE. In addition to other duties prescribed by this subchapter, the office shall:

(1) coordinate public and private programs for the benefit of immigrants and refugees;

(2) receive and address inquiries relating to the services available to immigrants or refugees at the local, state, and federal levels; and

(3) assist local communities with the development of programs to address the needs of immigrants and refugees at the local level.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 627, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 752.008. GIFTS, GRANTS, AND DONATIONS. The office may solicit and accept gifts, grants, and donations for the benefit of immigrant or refugee programs within the state.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 627, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 752.009. FUNDING. Except for any unspent appropriations transferred under this Act or any gifts, grants, or donations accepted under this Act, the Office of Immigration and Refugee Affairs may use only federal funds to perform the duties prescribed by this Act.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 627, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

SUBCHAPTER B. GOVERNOR'S ADVISORY COMMITTEE ON IMMIGRATION AND REFUGEES

Sec. 752.021. GOVERNOR'S ADVISORY COMMITTEE ON IMMIGRATION AND REFUGEES. The Governor's Advisory Committee on Immigration and Refugees is created within the office of the governor. The committee shall advise and make recommendations to the Office of Immigration and Refugee Affairs on immigration and refugee issues, including the SLIAG program authorized by the Immigration Reform and Control Act of 1986 (8 U.S.C. Section 1101 et seq.) and the refugee assistance programs authorized by the Refugee Act of 1980 (8 U.S.C. Section 1521 et seq.).

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 627, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 752.022. COMPOSITION OF COMMITTEE; TERMS; PRESIDING OFFICER. (a) The committee is composed of 12 members appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate as follows:

(1) two representatives of the refugee population;

(2) two representatives of the immigrant population;

(3) three representatives of local provider programs that serve immigrants or refugees and that receive federal funds, with one each from a public health program, a public assistance program, and an education program;

(4) three representatives from voluntary resettlement agencies that receive state or federal funds;

(5) one representative from a legal organization that is involved in issues relating to immigrants or refugees; and

(6) one representative from a service organization that works with immigrants or refugees.

(b) Committee members serve for terms of two years that expire February 1 of each odd-numbered year.

(c) The governor shall appoint a member of the committee to serve as the chair of the committee for a one-year term.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 627, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 752.023. COMPENSATION AND REIMBURSEMENT OF COMMITTEE MEMBERS. A member of the committee may not receive compensation for service on the committee but is entitled to reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses incurred in performing the member's duties subject to any applicable limitation on reimbursement provided by the General Appropriations Act for a state employee.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 627, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 752.024. FUNCTIONS OF COMMITTEE. The committee shall:

(1) advise and make recommendations to the Office of Immigration and Refugee Affairs regarding policy, planning, and priorities for the SLIAG program and refugee assistance programs;

(2) advise and make recommendations to the Office of Immigration and Refugee Affairs regarding coordination of the efforts of all public agencies involved in health, human services, and education matters that relate to federal immigration and refugee laws and rules or implementation of the SLIAG program or refugee assistance programs;

(3) encourage communication and cooperation among local agencies and programs, state agencies, immigration-related and refugee-related legal and service agencies, and the federal government;

(4) assist the Office of Immigration and Refugee Affairs in applying for the maximum amount of federal funds available for SLIAG-related programs and activities and refugee-related programs and activities and in identifying local programs and costs relating to immigration or refugees for which the state or a political subdivision may receive reimbursement;

(5) provide information to programs and activities that serve and encourage legalization and education of residents of this state;

(6) review federal issues regarding the SLIAG program and refugee assistance programs and make recommendations to the Office of Immigration and Refugee Affairs to encourage the development of a state response to federal issues;

(7) review and make recommendations to the Office of Immigration and Refugee Affairs and state agencies to ensure that the system of fiscal and program operations for the SLIAG program and refugee assistance programs is consistent with existing state and federal requirements;

(8) assist the Office of Immigration and Refugee Affairs in the development of an annual report on the status of the SLIAG program and refugee assistance programs in the state;

(9) advise and make recommendations to the Office of Immigration and Refugee Affairs on other related matters as directed by the governor; and

(10) assist the Office of Immigration and Refugee Affairs in the development of a spending plan for fiscal years 1993 and 1994 proposing spending priorities for SLIAG funds for services to eligible legalized aliens and for other federal funds available to benefit immigrants or refugees in the state.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 627, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 752.026. FUNDING. Except for any unspent appropriations transferred under this subchapter or gifts, grants, or donations accepted under this subchapter, the Governor's Advisory Committee on Immigration and Refugees may use only federal funds to perform the duties prescribed by this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 627, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

SUBCHAPTER C. ENFORCEMENT OF STATE AND FEDERAL IMMIGRATION LAWS BY LOCAL ENTITIES AND CAMPUS POLICE DEPARTMENTS

Sec. 752.051. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Campus police department" means a law enforcement agency of an institution of higher education.

(2) "Immigration laws" means the laws of this state or federal law relating to aliens, immigrants, or immigration, including the federal Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. Section 1101 et seq.).

(3) "Institution of higher education" means:

(A) an institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code; or

(B) a private or independent institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code.

(4) "Lawful detention" means the detention of an individual by a local entity, state criminal justice agency, or campus police department for the investigation of a criminal offense. The term excludes a detention if the sole reason for the detention is that the individual:

(A) is a victim of or witness to a criminal offense; or

(B) is reporting a criminal offense.

(5) "Local entity" means:

(A) the governing body of a municipality, county, or special district or authority, subject to Section 752.052;

(B) an officer or employee of or a division, department, or other body that is part of a municipality, county, or special district or authority, including a sheriff, municipal police department, municipal attorney, or county attorney; and

(C) a district attorney or criminal district attorney.

(6) "Policy" includes a formal, written rule, order, ordinance, or policy and an informal, unwritten policy.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 4 (S.B. 4), Sec. 1.01, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 752.052. APPLICABILITY OF SUBCHAPTER. (a) This subchapter does not apply to a hospital or hospital district created under Subtitle C or D, Title 4, Health and Safety Code, a federally qualified health center as defined in Section 31.017, Health and Safety Code, a hospital owned or operated by an institution of higher education, or a hospital district created under a general or special law authorized by Article IX, Texas Constitution, to the extent that the hospital or hospital district is providing access to or delivering medical or health care services as required under the following applicable federal or state laws:

(1) 42 U.S.C. Section 1395dd;

(2) 42 U.S.C. Section 1396b(v);

(3) Subchapter C, Chapter 61, Health and Safety Code;

(4) Chapter 81, Health and Safety Code; and

(5) Section 311.022, Health and Safety Code.

(b) Subsection (a) excludes the application of this subchapter to a commissioned peace officer:

(1) employed by a hospital or hospital district during the officer's employment; or

(2) commissioned by a hospital or hospital district.

(c) This subchapter does not apply to a commissioned peace officer employed or contracted by a religious organization during the officer's employment with the organization or while the officer is performing the contract.

(d) This subchapter does not apply to a school district or open-enrollment charter school, including a peace officer employed or contracted by a district or charter school during the officer's employment with the district or charter school or while the officer is performing the contract. This subchapter does not apply to the release of information contained in educational records of an educational agency or institution, except in conformity with the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (20 U.S.C. Section 1232g).

(e) This subchapter does not apply to the public health department of a local entity.

(f) This subchapter does not apply to:

(1) a community center as defined by Section 571.003, Health and Safety Code; or

(2) a local mental health authority as defined by Section 531.002, Health and Safety Code.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 4 (S.B. 4), Sec. 1.01, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 752.053. POLICIES AND ACTIONS REGARDING IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT.

Text of subsection effective until January 01, 2025

(a) A local entity or campus police department may not:

(1) adopt, enforce, or endorse a policy under which the entity or department prohibits or materially limits the enforcement of immigration laws;

(2) as demonstrated by pattern or practice, prohibit or materially limit the enforcement of immigration laws; or

(3) for an entity that is a law enforcement agency or for a department, as demonstrated by pattern or practice, intentionally violate Article 2.251, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Text of subsection effective on January 01, 2025

(a) A local entity or campus police department may not:

(1) adopt, enforce, or endorse a policy under which the entity or department prohibits or materially limits the enforcement of immigration laws;

(2) as demonstrated by pattern or practice, prohibit or materially limit the enforcement of immigration laws; or

(3) for an entity that is a law enforcement agency or for a department, as demonstrated by pattern or practice, intentionally violate Article 2A.060, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Text of subsection effective until January 01, 2025

(b) In compliance with Subsection (a), a local entity or campus police department may not prohibit or materially limit a person who is a commissioned peace officer described by Article 2.12, Code of Criminal Procedure, a corrections officer, a booking clerk, a magistrate, or a district attorney, criminal district attorney, or other prosecuting attorney and who is employed by or otherwise under the direction or control of the entity or department from doing any of the following:

(1) inquiring into the immigration status of a person under a lawful detention or under arrest;

(2) with respect to information relating to the immigration status, lawful or unlawful, of any person under a lawful detention or under arrest, including information regarding the person's place of birth:

(A) sending the information to or requesting or receiving the information from United States Citizenship and Immigration Services, United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement, or another relevant federal agency;

(B) maintaining the information; or

(C) exchanging the information with another local entity or campus police department or a federal or state governmental entity;

(3) assisting or cooperating with a federal immigration officer as reasonable or necessary, including providing enforcement assistance; or

(4) permitting a federal immigration officer to enter and conduct enforcement activities at a jail to enforce federal immigration laws.

Text of subsection effective on January 01, 2025

(b) In compliance with Subsection (a), a local entity or campus police department may not prohibit or materially limit a person who is a commissioned peace officer described by Article 2A.001, Code of Criminal Procedure, a corrections officer, a booking clerk, a magistrate, or a district attorney, criminal district attorney, or other prosecuting attorney and who is employed by or otherwise under the direction or control of the entity or department from doing any of the following:

(1) inquiring into the immigration status of a person under a lawful detention or under arrest;

(2) with respect to information relating to the immigration status, lawful or unlawful, of any person under a lawful detention or under arrest, including information regarding the person's place of birth:

(A) sending the information to or requesting or receiving the information from United States Citizenship and Immigration Services, United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement, or another relevant federal agency;

(B) maintaining the information; or

(C) exchanging the information with another local entity or campus police department or a federal or state governmental entity;

(3) assisting or cooperating with a federal immigration officer as reasonable or necessary, including providing enforcement assistance; or

(4) permitting a federal immigration officer to enter and conduct enforcement activities at a jail to enforce federal immigration laws.

(c) Notwithstanding Subsection (b)(3), a local entity or campus police department may prohibit persons who are employed by or otherwise under the direction or control of the entity or department from assisting or cooperating with a federal immigration officer if the assistance or cooperation occurs at a place of worship.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 4 (S.B. 4), Sec. 1.01, eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.115, eff. January 1, 2025.

Sec. 752.054. DISCRIMINATION PROHIBITED. A local entity, campus police department, or a person employed by or otherwise under the direction or control of the entity or department may not consider race, color, religion, language, or national origin while enforcing immigration laws except to the extent permitted by the United States Constitution or Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 4 (S.B. 4), Sec. 1.01, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 752.055. COMPLAINT; EQUITABLE RELIEF. (a) Any citizen residing in the jurisdiction of a local entity or any citizen enrolled at or employed by an institution of higher education may file a complaint with the attorney general if the person asserts facts supporting an allegation that the entity or the institution's campus police department has violated Section 752.053. The citizen must include a sworn statement with the complaint stating that to the best of the citizen's knowledge, all of the facts asserted in the complaint are true and correct.

(b) If the attorney general determines that a complaint filed under Subsection (a) against a local entity or campus police department is valid, the attorney general may file a petition for a writ of mandamus or apply for other appropriate equitable relief in a district court in Travis County or in a county in which the principal office of the entity or department is located to compel the entity or department that is suspected of violating Section 752.053 to comply with that section.

(c) An appeal of a suit brought under Subsection (b) is governed by the procedures for accelerated appeals in civil cases under the Texas Rules of Appellate Procedure. The appellate court shall render its final order or judgment with the least possible delay.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 4 (S.B. 4), Sec. 1.01, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 752.056. CIVIL PENALTY. (a) A local entity or campus police department that is found by a court of law as having intentionally violated Section 752.053 is subject to a civil penalty in an amount:

(1) not less than $1,000 and not more than $1,500 for the first violation; and

(2) not less than $25,000 and not more than $25,500 for each subsequent violation.

(b) Each day of a continuing violation of Section 752.053 constitutes a separate violation for the civil penalty under this section.

(c) The court that hears an action brought under Section 752.055 against the local entity or campus police department shall determine the amount of the civil penalty under this section.

(d) A civil penalty collected under this section shall be deposited to the credit of the compensation to victims of crime fund established under Subchapter J, Chapter 56B, Code of Criminal Procedure.

(e) Sovereign immunity of this state and governmental immunity of a county and municipality to suit is waived and abolished to the extent of liability created by this section.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 4 (S.B. 4), Sec. 1.01, eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 469 (H.B. 4173), Sec. 2.51, eff. January 1, 2021.

Sec. 752.0565. REMOVAL FROM OFFICE. (a) For purposes of Section 66.001, Civil Practice and Remedies Code, a person holding an elective or appointive office of a political subdivision of this state does an act that causes the forfeiture of the person's office if the person violates Section 752.053.

(b) The attorney general shall file a petition under Section 66.002, Civil Practice and Remedies Code, against a public officer to which Subsection (a) applies if presented with evidence, including evidence of a statement by the public officer, establishing probable grounds that the public officer engaged in conduct described by Subsection (a). The court in which the petition is filed shall give precedence to proceedings relating to the petition in the same manner as provided for an election contest under Section 23.101.

(c) If the person against whom an information is filed based on conduct described by Subsection (a) is found guilty as charged, the court shall enter judgment removing the person from office.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 4 (S.B. 4), Sec. 1.01, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 752.057. COMMUNITY OUTREACH POLICY.

Text of subsection effective until January 01, 2025

(a) Each law enforcement agency that is subject to the requirements of this subchapter may adopt a written policy requiring the agency to perform community outreach activities to educate the public that a peace officer may not inquire into the immigration status of a victim of or witness to an alleged criminal offense unless, as provided by Article 2.13, Code of Criminal Procedure, the officer determines that the inquiry is necessary to:

(1) investigate the offense; or

(2) provide the victim or witness with information about federal visas designed to protect individuals providing assistance to law enforcement.

Text of subsection effective on January 01, 2025

(a) Each law enforcement agency that is subject to the requirements of this subchapter may adopt a written policy requiring the agency to perform community outreach activities to educate the public that a peace officer may not inquire into the immigration status of a victim of or witness to an alleged criminal offense unless, as provided by Article 2A.059, Code of Criminal Procedure, the officer determines that the inquiry is necessary to:

(1) investigate the offense; or

(2) provide the victim or witness with information about federal visas designed to protect individuals providing assistance to law enforcement.

(b) A policy adopted under this section must include outreach to victims of:

(1) family violence, as that term is defined by Section 71.004, Family Code, including those receiving services at family violence centers under Chapter 51, Human Resources Code; and

(2) sexual assault, including those receiving services under a sexual assault program, as those terms are defined by Section 420.003.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 4 (S.B. 4), Sec. 1.01, eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.116, eff. January 1, 2025.